Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-505
Department of Health and Human Services; public health; duties; fees.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall secure and maintain in all parts of the state an official record and notification of reportable diseases, illnesses, or poisonings, provide popular literature upon the different branches of public health and distribute the same free throughout the state in a manner best calculated to promote that interest, prepare and exhibit in the different communities of the state public health demonstrations accompanied by lectures and audiovisual aids, provide preventive services to protect the public, and in all other effective ways prevent the origin and spread of disease and promote the public health.

(2) The department may provide technical services to and on behalf of health care providers and may charge fees for such services in an amount sufficient to recover the administrative costs of such services. Such fees shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. VIII, § 5, p. 781;

C.S.1922, § 8226;

C.S.1929, § 71-2305;

R.S.1943, § 71-505;

Laws 1986, LB 763, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 496;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 384.